Idaho, session 2025, S1089.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 65, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. That Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 65, Title 39, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 65
WASTE TIRE DISPOSAL AND RECYCLING
39-6501. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Waste Tire Disposal and Recycling Act."
39-6502. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. (1) The state of Idaho supports and
encourages the reuse and recycling of waste tires. The legislature finds
the paramount public interest in regulating waste tires is to protect public
health and safety. In particular, the legislature is concerned with elimi-
nating potential fire hazards, minimizing or eliminating potential breeding
grounds for disease-bearing insects, and eliminating potential sources of
surface and ground water contamination.
(2) The legislature finds that the Idaho department of environmental
quality identified twenty-two (22) abandoned tire piles in the state of
Idaho.
(3) The legislature finds that the disposal of waste tires is a matter
of statewide concern and that recycling of waste tires should be promoted
considering the health, environmental, economic benefits, and fire safety
benefits.


(4) The legislature further finds that the recycling of waste tires
will decrease the number of tires disposed in landfills and reduce the health
and safety hazards posed by abandoned waste tire storage sites not in compli-
ance with this chapter.
(5) The legislature further finds that the establishment of a fee to
be used for partial reimbursement of the costs of transporting, processing,
and recycling waste tires; for remediation of waste tire storage sites that
are not permitted by or have not received written county or city authoriza-
tion for operation; for providing moneys to cities and counties to enforce
the provisions of this chapter; and for administration of this chapter by the
department of environmental quality is environmentally and economically in
the best interest of the state.
39-6503. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Abandoned waste tire storage site" means a site that contains more
than two hundred (200) tires and is not permitted by a city or county or is
otherwise in violation of this chapter.
(2) "Beneficial reuse" means the conversion of a waste tire to a product
that is environmentally useful.
(3) "City" means the city where the waste tire storage site is located.
(4) "Commission" means the Idaho state tax commission.
(5) "County" means the county where the waste tire storage site is lo-
cated.
(6) "Department" means the Idaho department of environmental quality.
(7) "Director" means the director of the department.
(8) "Dispose" means to drop, deposit, dump, spill, or permanently place
any waste tire onto or under the ground or into the waters of this state or
to own or control property where waste tires are dropped, deposited, dumped,
spilled, or permanently placed onto or under the ground or into the waters of
this state.
(9) "End product" means a product that has component material derived
from waste tires and that the department has determined to have a demon-
strated market and substantial recycled tire content.
(10) "Existing waste tire storage site" means any property storing
waste tires prior to recycle, reuse, or final disposal, regardless of
whether the owner or operator possesses a permit or other written city or
county authorization authorizing the storage of waste tires at the property.
(11) "Fund" means the waste tire recycling and remediation fund estab-
lished pursuant to section 39-6508, Idaho Code.
(12) "Ground rubber" means waste tires that have been ground, shredded,
or otherwise reduced in size such that the particles are less than or equal
to three quarters (3/4) of an inch in diameter and are ninety-eight percent
(98%) wire-free by weight.
(13) "Materials derived from waste tires" means ground rubber, tire
sections, tire shreds, rubber, steel, fabric, or other similar materials
derived from waste tires.
(14) "Mining waste tire" means a waste tire that is greater than fifty-
four (54) inches in diameter and was used in mining operations. Mining waste
tires may be disposed of by burial. The department of lands shall prepare
guidelines to govern the burial of mining waste tires.


(15) "Motor vehicle tire" has the same meaning as provided in section
49-121(2), Idaho Code, with such tires used on a motor vehicle that operates
on the roads of the state.
(16) "New waste tire storage site" means any property that is not stor-
ing waste tires and applies for and receives a permit or other written city or
county authorization to store waste tires prior to recycle, reuse, or final
disposal.
(17) "Operator" means any person presently or who was during any period
of waste tire storage or disposal in control of or having responsibility for
a waste tire storage site or a waste tire disposal site.
(18) "Owner" means a person who previously owned a waste tire storage
site or disposal site at any time waste tires were stored or disposed at the
property and the current owner of the waste tire storage site or waste tire
disposal site.
(19) "Person" means an individual, public or private corporation, part-
nership, association, firm, joint stock company, joint venture, trust, es-
tate, municipality, commission, political subdivision of the state, state
or federal agency, department or instrumentality, special district, inter-
state body or any legal entity that is recognized by law as the subject of
rights and duties.
(20) "Recycler" means a business operating in the state that annually
uses:
(a) Or can reasonably be expected during the next year to use a minimum
of one hundred thousand (100,000) waste tires generated in the state or
one thousand two hundred fifty (1,250) tons of waste tires generated in
the state to recover energy or produce energy, ground rubber, or an end
product; or
(b) One hundred twenty-five (125) tons or more of waste tires generated
in the state in end products.
(21) "Retail tire dealer" means any person actively engaged in the busi-
ness of selling new, used, or retread replacement tires at the retail level.
(22) "Store" or "storage" means to accumulate more than two hundred
(200) waste tires at any time in a manner that does not constitute final
disposal at a waste tire disposal site or to own or control property on which
more than two hundred (200) waste tires accumulate at any given time in a
manner that does not constitute final disposal at a waste tire disposal site.
The following activities shall not constitute "storing" or "storage" of
waste tires:
(a) A retail tire dealer collecting less than one thousand five hundred
(1,500) waste tires at any point in time for each retail business loca-
tion;
(b) A tire retreader collecting less than three thousand (3,000) waste
tires at any point in time for each individual retread operation as long
as the waste tires are of the type the retreader is actively retreading;
(c) A wrecking salvage business collecting less than one thousand five
hundred (1,500) waste tires for each retail business location;
(d) A waste tire disposal site collecting waste tires for disposal at
the site in accordance with the site's approved operating plan;


(e) A wholesale tire dealer collecting less than one thousand five hun-
dred (1,500) waste tires at any point in time for each wholesale busi-
ness location;
(f) An approved solid waste transfer station or solid waste landfill
collecting less than one thousand five hundred (1,500) waste tires
prior to transfer to an approved waste tire storage or disposal site;
(g) A farm or livestock operation that utilizes waste tires to secure
farm or livestock silage or wastes provided the total number of waste
tires shall not exceed one thousand five hundred (1,500); or
(h) A recycler using a total amount of waste tires that does not exceed
three thousand (3,000) tons. However, a tire recycler may possess more
tires than are provided for in this paragraph if such tire recycler sat-
isfies a bonding requirement as provided for in this chapter.
(23) "Tire retreader" means any person actively engaged in the business
of retreading tires by scarifying the surface to remove the old surface tread
and attaching a new tread to make a usable tire.
(24) "Transport" or "transporting" means picking up or hauling waste
tires.
(25) "Waste tire" means a motor vehicle tire originally used for opera-
tion of a vehicle on a public roadway that is no longer suitable for its orig-
inal intended purpose because of wear, damage, or defect.
(26) "Waste tire disposal site" means a public or private municipal
solid waste landfill operating in compliance with section 39-6504, Idaho
Code.
(27) "Waste tire storage site" means a new or existing waste tire stor-
age site.
(28) "Wholesale tire dealer" means any person engaged in the business of
selling new replacement tires to tire retailers.
(29) "Wrecking salvage business" means any establishment or place of
business that is maintained, used, or operated for storing, keeping, buying,
or selling wrecked, scrapped, ruined, or dismantled motor vehicles or motor
vehicle parts.
39-6504. WASTE TIRE STORAGE SITES. (1) No person shall store waste
tires on any public or private property in this state or in the waters of this
state unless the property is a waste tire storage site as defined or other-
wise exempted in this chapter.
(2) No person shall own or operate a waste tire storage site without a
permit or other written county or city authorization.
(a) Counties and cities shall only issue permits or other written au-
thorizations that contain terms and conditions that assure waste tire
storage sites are operated in compliance with this chapter and any addi-
tional requirements the county or city deems appropriate.
(b) If a county or city determines not to issue a permit, other writ-
ten authorization, or a modification to an existing permit or approval
for an existing waste tire storage site, the existing waste tire stor-
age site shall cease storing waste tires no later than three (3) months
after receiving notice of the determination not to issue a permit, other
written authorization, or modification for the site.


(c) The current owner or operator of a new waste tire storage site
shall not commence waste tire storage at the site until the county or
city issues a permit or other written authorization permitting waste
tire storage. A recycler who owns and operates a recycling facility
in the state of Idaho on the effective date of this chapter shall not
be required to obtain any permits, licenses, or other authorizations
from a county or city. In addition to the provisions of this section, a
recycler shall be regulated as provided for in section 39-6503(22)(h),
Idaho Code.
(d) Counties and cities shall issue permits and other written local au-
thorizations for waste tire storage sites. Upon written request from
the city council or board of county commissioners to the department, the
department shall be responsible for the permitting and authorization
requirements of this section with respect to any application submitted
to the county or city, in lieu of the county or city.
(e) The owner or operator of a waste tire storage site shall maintain
financial assurance in the form of a cash bond payable to the county or
city, in an amount acceptable to the county or city where the waste tire
storage site is located; provided however, counties and cities shall
require a minimum initial financial assurance of two dollars and fifty
cents ($2.50) per tire authorized to be stored at the site. The amount
of financial assurance shall be adjusted each year in accordance with
the consumer price index on the anniversary date of the issuance of the
permit or other city or county written authorization. Failure to ad-
just the amount of financial assurance on the anniversary date each year
shall constitute failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter
and shall result in automatic revocation of the permit or other writ-
ten city or county authorization and forfeiture of the bond. Cities and
counties shall only process an application submitted under this section
when documentation submitted with the application establishes compli-
ance with the financial assurance requirement of this paragraph. The
current owner or operator of a new waste tire storage site shall com-
ply with the financial assurance requirement of this section prior to
commencing waste tire storage at the site. Upon written request from
the city council or board of county commissioners to the department, the
cash bond will be written in favor of the department, in lieu of the city
or county. In such cases, the department will oversee use of the bond
should two (2) bond holders become liable on the bond obligation.
(f) Counties and cities shall only issue a permit or written authoriza-
tion to a waste tire storage site when the application establishes that
the proposed or existing site is located on property owned as exclu-
sively for industrial use.
(g) Counties and cities may charge a fee for processing a waste tire
storage site permit or authorization application or renewal.
(h) Owners and operators of a waste tire storage site shall record and
maintain on-site operational records for a period of three (3) years,
including but not limited to the daily quantity of tires transported
to and from the site and the estimated quantity of tires located at the
site.


(i) The county or city may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a waste
tire storage site's permit or written authorization if the county or
city determines that the site is operating in violation of any require-
ment of this chapter or any term or condition of the site's permit or
written authorization.
(3) In the event the current owner or operator of an existing or new
waste tire storage site fails to comply with the requirements of this sec-
tion, the board of county commissioners or city council may declare the site
a public nuisance and may declare a public health or safety emergency based
on potential fire hazard, threat of insect borne disease, or potential con-
tamination of the state's ground or surface waters. If the respective gov-
erning authority has declared a public health or safety emergency, the di-
rector is authorized and directed to use the fund created in section 39-6508,
Idaho Code, for the purpose of removing and properly disposing of the tires
upon the recommendation of the state fire marshal in the event of fire haz-
ard, the district health department in the event of insect borne disease haz-
ard, or the department in the event of ground or surface water contamination
hazard.
(a) The director shall be authorized to expend funds from the waste tire
recycling and remediation fund if revenues in the fund are sufficient to
cover the costs or, if revenues in the waste tire recycling and remedi-
ation fund are not sufficient to cover the costs, then against the gen-
eral fund, subject to approval by the board of examiners.
(b) Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to change
or impair any right of recovery or subrogation arising under any other
provision of law.
(c) The prosecuting attorney of the relevant county may act to fully re-
cover all costs incurred by the state of Idaho and its political subdi-
visions pursuant to this subsection, including but not limited to seek-
ing recovery from the owners and operators of an existing or new waste
tire storage site of the cost of any grant that may have been awarded
pursuant to this chapter.
39-6505. WASTE TIRE DISPOSAL. (1) No person shall dispose of waste
tires on any public or private property in this state or in the waters of this
state except at permitted public or private municipal solid waste landfills
that have been approved to accept waste tires in their operating plans.
(2) Waste tires may be disposed at a permitted public or private munic-
ipal solid waste landfill with an approved operating plan only if the waste
tires have been processed to meet the following criteria:
(a) The volume of one hundred (100) unprepared randomly selected whole
tires in one (1) continuous test period shall be reduced by at least
sixty-five percent (65%) of the original volume pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section. No single void space greater than one hundred
twenty-five (125) cubic inches may remain in the randomly placed pro-
cessed tires; or
(b) The tires shall be reduced to an average chip size no greater than
sixty-four (64) square inches in any randomly selected sample of ten
(10) tires or more. No more than forty percent (40%) of the chips may
exceed sixty-four (64) square inches.


(3) Tire volumes shall be calculated as follows:
(a) Unprocessed whole tire volume shall be calculated by randomly
placing one hundred (100) unprepared randomly selected whole tires in a
rectangular container and multiplying the depth of unprocessed tires by
the bottom area of the container; and
(b) Processed tire volume shall be determined by randomly placing the
processed tire test quantity in a rectangular container and leveling
the surface. It shall be calculated by multiplying the depth of pro-
cessed tires by the bottom area of the container.
39-6506. TRANSPORT OF WASTE TIRES. (1) No person shall transport waste
tires for storage to any location in this state other than to a waste tire
storage site for which a city or county has issued a permit or other written
city or county authorization in active status.
(2) No person shall transport waste tires for disposal to any location
in this state other than to a municipal solid waste landfill that is operat-
ing in compliance with the requirements of section 39-6505, Idaho Code.
39-6507. WASTE TIRE RECYCLING FEE. (1) There is hereby imposed a waste
tire recycling fee of fifty cents (50¢) per new motor vehicle tire sold at re-
tail. The waste tire recycling fee shall be separate from other nongovern-
mental fees charged by a retailer.
(2) The amount of the fee that is collected by a seller from a purchaser
shall be separately designated by the retailer and designated on the receipt
or invoice accompanying the sale.
(3) The waste tire recycling fee shall not be imposed on the sale of re-
treaded or used tires.
(4) The fee for each tire with a rim diameter up to and including twenty-
four and one-half (24.5) inches, single or dual bead capacity, is fifty cents
(50¢).
(5) The provisions of this section shall be null, void, and of no force
and effect on and after July 1, 2028.
39-6508. WASTE TIRE RECYCLING AND REMEDIATION FUND. There is hereby
established in the state treasury the waste tire recycling and remediation
fund, which shall be administered by the director and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(1) Proceeds of any waste tire recycling fee;
(2) Penalties collected under this chapter;
(3) Interest earned on moneys in the fund; and
(4) Moneys recovered by a prosecuting attorney in any action pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter.
39-6509. PILOT PROJECT. (1) There is hereby created a pilot project
for the purposes of:
(a) Developing a department strategy, staff, and equipment necessary
to conduct the pilot project;
(b) Remediating abandoned tire piles as determined by the department;
(c) Providing moneys to cities and counties to enforce the provisions
of this chapter; and


(d) Providing rebates to recyclers who recycle tires found in this
state.
(2) For the purposes of the pilot project established in this section:
(a) For fiscal year 2026, moneys in the waste tire recycling and remedi-
ation fund shall be appropriated to the department exclusively for the
administrative costs, including staff and equipment, to operate the pi-
lot project and for providing moneys to the department to make grants to
cities and counties to enforce the provisions of this chapter; and
(b) For fiscal years 2027 and 2028, the waste tire recycling and remedi-
ation fund shall be appropriated in the following order for:
(i) Providing moneys to the department to make grants to cities
and counties to enforce the provisions of this chapter or for the
director to contract directly with third parties to remediate
abandoned tire piles;
(ii) Departmental administrative costs, including personnel and
equipment to operate the pilot project;
(iii) The remediation of abandoned tire piles; and
(iv) Rebates to recyclers as provided in this chapter.
39-6510. PAYMENT OF WASTE TIRE RECYCLING FEE -- ADMINISTRATIVE
CHARGE. (1) A retail tire dealer shall remit the fees collected from waste
tire recycling to the state tax commission.
(2) Fees collected by sellers shall be remitted to the state tax com-
mission at the times and in the manner provided for in chapter 36, title 63,
Idaho Code, with respect to the sales tax. The state tax commission shall
establish registration, reporting, and payment procedures that substan-
tially coincide with the registration and payment procedures that apply to
the sales tax pursuant to the provisions of chapter 36, title 63, Idaho Code.
(3) The payment shall be accompanied by a form prescribed by the state
tax commission.
(4)(a) The proceeds of the fee shall be transferred by the state tax
commission to the waste tire recycling and remediation fund for use as
prescribed in section 39-6508, Idaho Code.
(b) The state tax commission shall retain and deposit an administrative
charge of ten dollars ($10.00) for the revenue the state tax commission
collects from a fee under section 39-6507, Idaho Code.
(5)(a) The state tax commission shall administer, collect, and enforce
the fee authorized under this chapter in accordance with the same pro-
cedures used in the administration, collection, and enforcement of the
state sales and use tax. The following provisions of chapter 36, title
63, Idaho Code, with respect to sales tax, shall apply to the waste tire
recycling fee:
(i) Audit and appeal procedures;
(ii) Collection, enforcement, penalties, and interest; and
(iii) Statute of limitations and refunds of fees paid erroneously.
(b) A retail tire dealer may retain two and one-half percent (2.5%) of
the waste tire recycling fee collected under this chapter for the cost
of collecting the fee.
(6) The fee imposed by this chapter is in addition to all other state,
county, or municipal fees and taxes imposed on the sale of new tires.


(7) The state tax commission shall have the authority to promul-
gate rules, subject to legislative approval, applicable to the waste tire
recycling fee. Such rules shall, to the extent practicable, minimize ad-
ministrative burdens on sellers by incorporating existing provisions of
chapter 36, title 63, Idaho Code, that apply to audits, appeals, collection,
enforcement, penalties, interest, statute of limitations, and refunds of
fees paid erroneously.
(8) The provisions of this section shall be null, void, and of no force
and effect on and after July 1, 2028.
39-6511. PARTIAL REIMBURSEMENT. (1) Waste tires generated in the
state shall include those generated at a retail tire dealer, those generated
from cleanup at a waste tire storage site not meeting the requirements of
this chapter, and those generated by Idaho residents and deposited at an
approved solid waste landfill or recycler within the state.
(2) Subject to the limitations in section 39-6512, Idaho Code, a recy-
cler is entitled to:
(a) Sixty-five dollars ($65.00) as partial reimbursement for each ton
of waste tires or material derived from waste tires converted to ground
rubber, if a contract exists for the sale of the ground rubber for use as
a component in an end product;
(b) Fifty dollars ($50.00) as partial reimbursement for each ton of
waste tires or material derived from waste tires recycled, other than as
ground rubber; and
(c) Twenty dollars ($20.00) as partial reimbursement for each ton of
ground rubber used for a beneficial reuse.
39-6512. LIMITATIONS ON REIMBURSEMENT. (1) The costs reimbursed under
this chapter may not exceed available moneys in the fund.
(2) If applications for reimbursement under this chapter exceed the
moneys in the fund, the director shall, as incoming funds allow, distribute
reimbursements in order from oldest to newest.
39-6513. PROHIBITED ACTS. No person shall advertise or represent him-
self as being in the business of accepting waste tires for transport, stor-
age, or disposal without being in full compliance with all the provisions of
this chapter.
39-6514. RECYCLING AND REUSE OF WASTE TIRES. The state of Idaho seeks
to protect human health and the environment by encouraging the recycling and
reuse of waste tires. Accordingly, the department shall identify approved
methods of recycling and beneficial reuse of waste tires.
39-6515. PENALTIES. Any person who knowingly stores, transports, or
disposes of a tire in violation of the provisions of this chapter is subject
to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) per viola-
tion. For the purposes of this chapter, a city council or board of county
commissioners, or their designees, shall have the same authority as the
director of the department of environmental quality pursuant to section
39-108, Idaho Code, with respect to:


(1) Conducting investigations and inspections;
(2) Having the right of entry;
(3) Issuing violations;
(4) Having enforcement authority; and
(5) Seeking injunctive relief.
39-6516. APPLICABILITY. The provisions of this chapter shall not ap-
ply to waste tires from any device moved exclusively by human power.
39-6517. ANNUAL REPORT TO LEGISLATURE REQUIRED. The director shall
publish annually by December 15 and provide to the appropriate germane leg-
islative committees information on the impact of this chapter in promoting
the cleanup of waste tires in Idaho. A copy of such report shall be submitted
to the legislative services office electronically. At a minimum, the infor-
mation shall include each of the following with respect to the prior year:
(1) The approximate number of tires recycled;
(2) The approximate number of waste tire storage sites remediated;
(3) The dollar amount expended on waste tire recycling, cleanup, and
remediation; and
(4) The dollar amount expended on partial reimbursements pursuant to
section 39-6511, Idaho Code.
39-6518. RULEMAKING AUTHORITY. The department is authorized to pro-
mulgate rules, subject to legislative approval, to implement the provisions
of this chapter.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.